apertium-sco.sco.dix
<pardef n="probj_dem__prn">
  <e>       <i></i></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>me</l>    <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l><b/>ye</l>    <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>you</l>   <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l><b/>him</l>   <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>her</l>   <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>it</l>    <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>hit</l>   <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>us</l>    <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>thaim</l> <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l><b/>this</l>  <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>these</l> <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>that</l>  <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>those</l> <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="th/is__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ese</l>       <r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="th/at__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ose</l>       <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e c="sub"><p><l>em</l>       <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="itsel__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="oorsels__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="yersels__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="everyone__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL" c="riparo"><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="baith__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="personnel__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <!-- permesu singularon de Esperanto -->
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cau/f__n">
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ee__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/it__n">
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>it<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>it<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="g/uiss__n">
  <e>       <p><l>uiss</l>      <r>uiss<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eese</l>      <r>uiss<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/oose__n">
  <e>       <p><l>oose</l>      <r>oose<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ice</l>       <r>oose<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sh/ae__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ae</l>        <r>ae<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uin</l>       <r>ae<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="t/uith__n">
  <e>       <p><l>uith</l>      <r>uith<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eeth</l>      <r>uith<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="w/umman__n">
  <e>       <p><l>umman</l>     <r>umman<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eemen</l>     <r>umman<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/an__n">
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hoose__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="aish__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="habb/y__n">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ie</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/cou__n">
  <e>       <p><l>cou</l>       <r>cou<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kye</l>       <r>cou<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BBC__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hoose__n__unc">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ox__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="oo__n">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="analys/is__n">
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pairt/y__n">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ys</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <!-- ugh -->
  <e r="RL"><p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lassie__dim__n">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="dim"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="dim"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="dim"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ess__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="wast__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="deer__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cauf__sg__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="caur__pl__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="access__n">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="niver__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ee">              <i>ee</i><par n="ee__n"/></e>
<e lm="fit">             <i>f</i><par n="f/it__n"/></e>
<e lm="moose">           <i>m</i><par n="m/oose__n"/></e>
<e lm="loose">           <i>l</i><par n="m/oose__n"/></e>
<e lm="shae">            <i>sh</i><par n="sh/ae__n"/></e>
<e lm="wumman">          <i>w</i><par n="w/umman__n"/></e>
<e lm="tuith">           <i>t</i><par n="t/uith__n"/></e>
<e lm="guiss">           <i>g</i><par n="g/uiss__n"/></e>
<e lm="man">             <i>m</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="cou">             <i></i><par n="/cou__n"/></e>
<e lm="breeks">           <i>breeks</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="cauf">             <i>cau</i><par n="cau/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="chiel">            <i>chiel</i><par n="aish__n"/></e>
<e lm="chore">            <i>chore</i><par n="aish__n"/></e>
<e lm="clamjamfry">       <i>clamjamfry</i><par n="habb/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="deuk">             <i>deuk</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
<e lm="indwaller">        <i>indwaller</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
<e lm="janny">            <i>janny</i><par n="habb/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="match">            <i>match</i><par n="aish__n"/></e>
<e lm="quality">          <i>quality</i><par n="habb/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="tot">              <i>tot</i><par n="hoose__n"/></e>
<e lm="nivver">          <i>nivver</i><par n="niver__adv"/></e>
<e lm="no">              <i>no</i><par n="niver__adv"/></e>
<e lm="this">            <i>that</i><par n="th/is__prn"/></e>
<e lm="that">            <i>that</i><par n="th/at__prn"/></e>
<e lm="something">       <i>something</i><par n="everyone__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ithers">          <i>ithers</i><par n="baith__prn"/></e>
<e lm="hee haw">         <i>hee<b/>haw</i><par n="everyone__prn"/></e>
<e lm="itsel">           <i>itsel</i><par n="itsel__prn"/></e>
<e lm="oorsels">         <i>oorsels</i><par n="oorsels__prn"/></e>
<e lm="yersels">         <i>yersels</i><par n="yersels__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="aabody">    <i>aabody</i><par n="everyone__prn"/></e>
<e lm="FAQ">             <i>FAQ</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="PC" a="carmentano"><i>PC</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="http" a="prompsit2cdl"><i>http</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="Mr">              <i>Mr</i><par n="ee__n"/></e>
<e lm="Mrs">             <i>Mrs</i><par n="ee__n"/></e>
<e lm="rash">            <i>rash</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="catch">           <i>catch</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="oo">              <i>oo</i><par n="oo__n"/></e>
<e lm="taw">             <i>taw</i><par n="oo__n"/></e>
<e lm="broth">           <i>broth</i><par n="ess__n"/></e>
<e lm="parritch">        <i>parritch</i><par n="ess__n"/></e>
<e lm="parritch">        <i>parritch</i><par n="ess__n"/></e>
<e lm="ee">              <i>ee</i><par n="cauf__sg__n"/></e>
<e lm="guiss">           <i>guiss</i><par n="cauf__sg__n"/></e>
<e lm="geese">           <i>geese</i><par n="caur__pl__n"/></e>
<e lm="owse">            <i>owse</i><par n="cauf__sg__n"/></e>
<e lm="owsen">           <i>owsen</i><par n="caur__pl__n"/></e>
<e lm="ox">              <i>ox</i><par n="ox__n"/></e>
<e lm="gait">            <i>gait</i><par n="deer__n"/></e>
<e lm="horse">           <i>horse</i><par n="deer__n"/></e>
<e lm="swine">           <i>swine</i><par n="deer__n"/></e>
<e lm="wast">            <i>wast</i><par n="wast__n"/></e>
<e lm="sooth">           <i>sooth</i><par n="wast__n"/></e>
<e lm="lauch">           <i>lauch</i><par n="hoose__n__unc"/></e>
<e lm="stap">            <i>stap</i><par n="hoose__n__unc"/></e>
<e lm="stap">            <i>stap</i><par n="hoose__n__unc"/></e>
<e lm="beastie">         <i>beastie</i><par n="lassie__dim__n"/></e>
<e lm="saftie">          <i>saftie</i><par n="lassie__dim__n"/></e>
<e lm="pleuchie">        <i>pleuchie</i><par n="lassie__dim__n"/></e>
<e lm="pairty">          <i>pairt</i><par n="pairt/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="basis">           <i>bas</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="gie a haun">      <i>gie</i><par n="gie__vblex_sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>haun</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>haun</g></r></p></e>
